New Mexico, session 2026, SB10.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 24 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] SHORT TITLE.--This act may be cited as the "Health Training Corps Act"." SECTION 2. A new section of Chapter 24 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Health Training Corps Act: A. "corps" means the health training corps; B. "department" means the department of health; C. "fund" means the health training corps fund; D. "health care underserved area" means a geographic area or practice location in which it has been determined by the department, through the use of indices and other standards set by the department, that sufficient health care services are not being provided; E. "health professional" means a licensed or certified physician, nurse practitioner, physician assistant, nurse-midwife or social worker; F. "health professional student" means a person who is receiving education and training to become a health professional; G. "health training site" means a health care facility located in a health care underserved area that allows health professional students and newly licensed health professionals the opportunity to train and learn through clinical experience; and H. "preceptor" means an experienced health professional who provides guidance, training and supervision to health professional students and newly licensed health professionals in a clinical setting." SECTION 3. A new section of Chapter 24 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] HEALTH TRAINING CORPS--CREATED--POWERS AND DUTIES.-- A. The "health training corps" is created in the department to recruit and place preceptors in health training sites. B. The secretary of health may employ a director to lead the corps. The director may employ support staff, and employees of the corps shall be subject to the provisions of the Personnel Act. C. The corps has the power to: (1) enter into contracts to carry out the provisions of the Health Training Corps Act; and (2) adopt rules, in accordance with the State Rules Act, to carry out the provisions of the Health Training Corps Act. D. The corps shall: (1) recruit health professionals to serve as preceptors at health training sites; (2) prioritize the placement of preceptors at health training sites that provide behavioral health care, primary health care and obstetrics and gynecological health care; (3) establish criteria and procedures for the acceptance of applications and selection of preceptors; (4) determine and maintain a list of eligible health training sites; (5) determine the need for preceptors at each health training site and assign preceptors as needed on a priority basis; and (6) provide support for preceptors at health training sites." SECTION 4. A new section of Chapter 24 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] CORPS SERVICES--STIPENDS.-- A. A preceptor who is selected by the corps to serve at a health training site shall be eligible for a stipend equal to one hundred dollars ($100) per hour of direct guidance, training and supervision provided to health professional students and newly licensed health professionals. B. A preceptor shall document all guidance, training and supervision provided to health professional students and newly licensed health professionals. The preceptor shall submit documentation of the guidance, training and supervision to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. C. A preceptor shall not receive more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) worth of stipends in any given year." SECTION 5. A new section of Chapter 24 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] LEGAL COUNSEL.--The office of general counsel of the department shall provide legal services to the corps. The general form of stipend contracts entered into pursuant to the provisions of the Health Training Corps Act shall be approved by a special assistant attorney general employed by the department and signed by the preceptor and the director of the corps or the director's authorized representative on behalf of the state. The corps is vested with full and complete authority and power to sue in its own name for any balance due the state from a preceptor on a stipend contract. Money paid pursuant to a contract shall be deposited in the general fund." SECTION 6. A new section of Chapter 24 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] HEALTH TRAINING CORPS FUND.-- A. The "health training corps fund" is created as a nonreverting fund in the state treasury. The fund consists of appropriations, gifts, grants, donations, income from investment of the fund and any other revenue credited to the fund. The department shall administer the fund, and money in the fund is appropriated to the department to carry out the provisions of this section. Expenditures shall be by warrant of the secretary of finance and administration pursuant to vouchers signed by the secretary of health or the secretary's authorized representative. B. Money in the fund may be used for: (1) recruiting preceptors; (2) training preceptors; (3) paying stipends to preceptors; and (4) providing support to preceptors located at health training sites." SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION.--Three million dollars ($3,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the health training corps fund for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years to carry out the purposes of the Health Training Corps Act. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. - 6 -